District of Columbia statutes.
38-1204.02

Advisory committees.

The Trustees shall appoint such advisory committees as are necessary to advise on educational policy. Such advisory committees may consist of members of the Trustees, students, faculty members, parents, and governmental, educational, business, industrial, labor, and community representatives.

History

Oct. 26, 1974, 88 Stat. 1429, Pub. L. 93-471, title IV, § 402
Nov. 1, 1975, D.C. Law 1-36, § 5, 22 DCR 2931

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1532.
1973 Ed., § 31-1732.